Maryland, session 2025, HB0375.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
21–1103.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b), (c), or (d) of this section, a person may
not drive any vehicle on a sidewalk or sidewalk area unless it is a permanent or authorized
temporary driveway.
(b) (1) For the purposes of this subsection, “bicycle” does not include “moped”,
as defined in § 11–134.1 of this article.
(2) [Where allowed] UNLESS PROHIBITED by local ordinance, a person
may ride a bicycle, play vehicle, or unicycle on a sidewalk or sidewalk area.
(3) In a place where a person may ride a bicycle on a sidewalk or sidewalk
area, a person may also ride a bicycle from the curb or edge of the roadway in or through a
– 1 –

Ch. 558 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
crosswalk to the opposite curb or edge of the roadway.
21–1202.
(b) (1) Subject to paragraphs (2) [and], (3), AND (4) of this subsection, a
person has the rights and is subject to the restrictions applicable to pedestrians under this
title while the person is lawfully operating a bicycle, play vehicle, or unicycle:
(i) On a sidewalk or sidewalk area; or
(ii) In or through a crosswalk.
(2) At an intersection, a person operating a bicycle, play vehicle, or unicycle
is subject to all traffic control signals, as provided in §§ 21–202 and 21–203 of this title.
(3) A PERSON OPERATING A BICYCLE, PLAY VEHICLE, OR UNICYCLE
ON A SIDEWALK OR SIDEWALK AREA OR IN OR THROUGH A CROSSWALK SHALL YIELD
THE RIGHT–OF–WAY TO A PEDESTRIAN OR A PERSON RIDING ON AN ELECTRIC
PERSONAL ASSISTIVE MOBILITY DEVICE.
[(3)] (4) Section 21–506 of this title does not apply to a person operating
a bicycle, play vehicle, or unicycle.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 13, 2025.
– 2 –